src/fst/morphology/phonology.xfscript
!! ============================================ !
!! # The Gunwinggu morphophonological rule file 
!! ============================================ !


echo
echo <<< Defining the phonological inventory >>>
define V  [ a | e | i | o | u ] ;
define C  [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l
          | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w
	      | x | y | z ] ;

echo <<< Flag diacritis >>>
define FLAGS [
    ("@R.TENSE.P@") | 
    ("@P.TENSE.P@") | 
    ("@R.TENSE.NP@") |
    ("@P.TENSE.NP@") |
    ("@P.VALENCE.TRNS@") |
    ("@R.VALENCE.TRNS@") |
    ("@P.VALENCE.INTR@") |
    ("@R.VALENCE.INTR@") ];

echo <<<  Define regular vowel changes  >>>
define DeletePrecedingVowel V -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "~" .o.
                            "~" -> 0;

echo <<<  Define regular vowel changes  >>>
define DeleteFollowingVowel V -> 0 || FLAGS * "^" "=" _ .o.
                            "=" -> 0 ;

echo <<<  Directional phonological changes  >>>
define DirPhonChanges "(ku)" -> 0 || V "^" _ m .o.
                      "(ku)" -> k u || FLAGS * "^" _ m .o.
                      "(ku)" -> 0 || _ ;

echo <<<  FlapVowelChanges  >>>
define FlapChange "(rr)" -> d ;

echo <<<  Biyameni -> Biyami  >>>
define NasalConsChange e -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "+" .o.
                       n -> 0 || "^" "+" _         .o.
                       "+" -> 0;

echo <<<  'r' can change depending on its environment   >>>
define RAllophony "(r)" -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "^" "(r)" .o.
                  "(r)" -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "^" r     .o.
                  "(r)" -> 0 || l _ .o.
                  "(r)" -> r;

echo <<<  Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries  >>>
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;


read regex [
    DeletePrecedingVowel 
.o. DeleteFollowingVowel
.o. DirPhonChanges      
.o. FlapChange          
.o. NasalConsChange     
.o. RAllophony 
.o. Cleanup
] ;



! 
! # Vowels
! define V [ a | e | i | o | u ];
! 
! # Consonents
! define C [ b | m | w | k | g | d | n | l | r | j | y | h ];
! 
! define bilabialStops ["b" | "bb"];
! define bilabialNasals ["m"];
! define bilabialSemivowel ["w"];
! define velarStops ["k" | "kk" | "g"];
! define velarNasal ["ng"];
! define apicoStops ["d" | "dd" | "rd" | "rdd"];
! define apicoNasals ["n" | "rn"];
! define apicoLateral ["l" | "rl"];
! define apicoRhotic ["rr" | "r"];
! define palatalStops ["dj" | "djdj"];
! define palatalNasals ["nj"];
! define palatalSemivowels ["y"];
! define glottalStop ["h"];
! define flap ["d" | "rr"];
! 
! define PhoneticVariation flap -> flap .o.
!                          apicoRhotic -> apicoRhotic .o.
!                          apicoNasals -> apicoNasals .o.
!                          apicoLateral -> apicoLateral .o.
!                          apicoStops -> apicoStops .o. 
!                          velarStops -> velarStops .o. 
!                          palatalStops -> palatalStops .o.
!                          bilabialStops -> bilabialStops;
! 
! 
! # Flag Diacritics
! define FLAGS [
!     ("@R.TENSE.P@") | 
!     ("@P.TENSE.P@") | 
!     ("@R.TENSE.NP@") |
!     ("@P.TENSE.NP@") |
!     ("@P.VALENCE.TRNS@") |
!     ("@R.VALENCE.TRNS@") |
!     ("@P.VALENCE.INTR@") |
!     ("@R.VALENCE.INTR@") ];
! 
! # Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
! define Cleanup "^" -> 0;
! 
! # Define regular vowel changes
! define DeletePrecedingVowel V -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "~" .o.
!                             "~" -> 0;
! 
! # Define regular vowel changes
! define DeleteFollowingVowel V -> 0 || FLAGS * "^" "=" _ .o.
!                             "=" -> 0 ;
! 
! # Directional phonological changes
! define DirPhonChanges "(ku)" -> 0 || V "^" _ m .o.
!                       "(ku)" -> k u || FLAGS * "^" _ m .o.
!                       "(ku)" -> 0 || _ ;
! 
! # FlapVowelChanges
! define FlapChange "(rr)" -> d ;
! 
! # Biyameni -> Biyami
! define NasalConsChange e -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "+" .o.
!                        n -> 0 || "^" "+" _       .o.
!                        "+" -> 0;
! 
! # 'r' can change depending on its environment
! define RAllophony "(r)" -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "^" "(r)" .o.
!                   "(r)" -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "^" r       .o.
!                   "(r)" -> 0 || l _ .o.
!                   "(r)" -> r;
! 
! define VerbGrammar  VerbLexicon              .o.
!                     DeletePrecedingVowel .o.
!                     DeleteFollowingVowel .o.
!                     DirPhonChanges       .o.
!                     FlapChange           .o.
!                     NasalConsChange      .o.
!                     RAllophony .o.
!                     Cleanup;
! 
! define NounGrammar NounLexicon .o.
!                    FlapChange           .o.
!                    NasalConsChange      .o.
!                    RAllophony .o.
!                    Cleanup;
! 
! define AdjAdvGrammar AdjAdvLexicon .o.
!                      FlapChange           .o.
!                      NasalConsChange      .o.
!                      RAllophony .o.
!                      Cleanup;
! 
! 
! regex FuncLexicon | AdjAdvGrammar | NounGrammar | VerbGrammar ;
! 
